Hawaii, session 2026, SB645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 37, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§37-     State positions; extended vacancies; budget restriction.  Any state position that remains vacant for longer than two years shall be removed from the state budget and shall not receive an appropriation by the legislature.  Any funds appropriated for the position shall lapse to the credit of the fund from which the moneys were appropriated or authorized." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________